Washington statutes.
RCW 36.29.210

Property tax exemption and deferral programs—Notice.

(1) The county treasurer must post a notice describing the:

(a) Property tax exemption program pursuant to RCW 84.36.379 through 84.36.389; and

(b) Property tax deferral program pursuant to chapter 84.38 RCW.

(2) The notice required under subsection (1) of this section must be posted in a location visible to the public.

[ 2019 c 332 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2019 c 332: See note following RCW 84.56.029.